Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.560

Title to real estate—Effect of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter may affect the title to real estate: PROVIDED, That a judgment for costs or fees awarded under this chapter constitutes a lien on real estate to the extent provided in chapter 4.56 RCW.

[ 2021 c 215 s 67.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.